Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 82.70.020 and 2024 c 310 s 608 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Employers in this state who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to their own or other employees for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before January 1, ((2025))2035, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of employees for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed $60 per employee per fiscal year.(2) Property managers who are taxable under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW and provide financial incentives to persons employed at a worksite in this state managed by the property manager for ride sharing, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting before January 1, ((2024))2035, are allowed a credit against taxes payable under chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW for amounts paid to or on behalf of these persons for ride sharing in vehicles carrying two or more persons, for using public transportation, for using car sharing, or for using nonmotorized commuting, not to exceed $60 per person per fiscal year.(3) The credit under this section is equal to the amount paid to or on behalf of each employee ((multiplied by 50 percent)), but may not exceed $60 per employee per fiscal year. No refunds may be granted for credits under this section.(4) A person may not receive credit under this section for amounts paid to or on behalf of the same employee under both chapters 82.04 and 82.16 RCW.(5) A person may not take a credit under this section for amounts claimed for credit by other persons.Sec. 2. RCW 82.70.040 and 2024 c 310 s 609 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The department must keep a running total of all credits allowed under RCW 82.70.020 during each fiscal year. The department may not allow any credits that would cause the total amount allowed to exceed $2,750,000 in any fiscal year.(b) If the total amount of credit applied for by all applicants in any year exceeds the limit in this subsection, the department must ratably reduce the amount of credit allowed for all applicants so that the limit in this subsection is not exceeded. If a credit is reduced under this subsection, the amount of the reduction may not be carried forward and claimed in subsequent fiscal years.(2)(a) Tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 may not be claimed in excess of the amount of tax otherwise due under chapter 82.04 or 82.16 RCW.(b) Through June 30, 2005, a person with taxes equal to or in excess of the credit under RCW 82.70.020, and therefore not subject to the limitation in (a) of this subsection, may elect to defer tax credits for a period of not more than three years after the year in which the credits accrue. For credits approved by the department through June 30, 2015, the approved credit may be carried forward and used for tax reporting periods through December 31, 2016. Credits approved after June 30, 2015, must be used for tax reporting periods within the calendar year for which they are approved by the department and may not be carried forward to subsequent tax reporting periods. Credits carried forward as authorized by this subsection are subject to the limitation in subsection (1)(a) of this section for the fiscal year for which the credits were originally approved.(3) No person may be approved for tax credits under RCW 82.70.020 in excess of (($100,000))$50,000 in any fiscal year. This limitation does not apply to credits carried forward from prior years under subsection (2)(b) of this section.(4) No person may claim tax credits after June 30, ((2025))2035.Sec. 3. RCW 82.70.900 and 2024 c 310 s 610 are each amended to read as follows:This chapter expires July 1, ((2025))2035.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. RCW 82.32.808 does not apply to this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---